Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-603
Definitions, where found.

For purposes of the Certified Nurse Midwifery Practice Act and elsewhere in the Uniform Credentialing Act, unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions found in sections 38-604 to 38-610 apply.

Laws 1984, LB 761, § 3;

Laws 1999, LB 828, § 160;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1740;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 215.